Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1364.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 427.30 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Oklahoma Medical Marijuana Authority is hereby
authorized to develop policies and procedures for a medical
marijuana business to disclose any outstanding state fees, fines,
taxes, or other debts prior to the sale of a medical marijuana
business.
B. Upon the effective date of this act, current medical
marijuana business licensees shall be required to submit under
penalty of perjury, an attestation confirming or denying the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1364 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

exis tence of any outstanding state fees, fines, taxes, or other
debts and, if applicable, shall disclose the amount of such fees,
fines, taxes, or other debts. Medical marijuana business licensees
shall, within sixty (60) days after the effective date of this act,
submit such attestation to the Authority prior to the sale of a
medical marijuana business. The Authority shall prescribe the form
of the attestation required under the provisions of this section,
and such form shall include an itemized list of any outstanding
state fees, fines, taxes, or other debts. The Authority shall make
the form available on its publicly accessible Internet website.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON BUSINESS AND INSURANCE
February 19, 2026 - DO PASS












SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1364 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)